California statutes. Penal Code
(II) If the court finds the conditions described in subclause (I) or (II) of clause (i) to be true, and has considered the conditions in subdivision (c), and if, pursuant to the opinion offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, a licensed psychologist has opined that treatment with antipsychotic medication may be appropriate for the individual, the court may issue an order authorizing treatment by a licensed psychiatrist on an involuntary basis. That treatment may include the administration of antipsychotic medication, as needed, to be administered under the direction and
 supervision of a licensed psychiatrist.

(B) A hearing pursuant to this section may occur at the same time as the competency hearing held pursuant to Section 1369.

(b) Before an order authorizing the administration of involuntary medication is issued pursuant to this section, the person shall have the following rights:

(1) To receive written notice of the diagnosis, the factual basis for the diagnosis, the expected benefits of the medication, any potential side effects and risks of the medication, and any alternatives to treatment with the medication.

(2) To be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings.

(3) To receive timely access to their medical records and files.

(4) To be present at all stages of the proceedings.

(5) To present evidence and cross-examine witnesses.

(c) After hearing, involuntary medication may be administered if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) A psychiatrist or psychologist has determined that the individual has a mental disorder that can be treated with antipsychotic
 medication.

(2) A psychiatrist or psychologist has determined that, as a result of that mental disorder, the individual is gravely disabled and lacks the capacity to consent to, or refuse treatment with, antipsychotic medications.

(3) That serious harm to the physical or mental health of the individual is likely to result absent treatment with antipsychotic medication.

(4) A psychiatrist has prescribed one or more antipsychotic medications for the treatment of the individual’s disorder, has considered the risk, benefits, and treatment
 alternatives to involuntary medication, and has determined that the treatment alternatives to involuntary medication are unlikely to meet the needs of the individual.

(5) The individual has been advised of the expected benefits of any potential side effects and risks to the individual, any
 alternatives to treatment with antipsychotic medication, and refuses, or is unable to consent to, the administration of the medication.

(6) The jail has made a documented attempt to locate an available bed for the individual in a community-based treatment facility in lieu of seeking to administer involuntary medication. If a community-based alternative is not available, medication shall only be administered by noncustody, health care staff and individuals will be monitored at least every 15 minutes for at least one hour after administration of medication.

(7) There is no less intrusive alternative to the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication, and involuntary administration of the medication is in the individual’s best medical interest.

(d) The individual’s confinement shall not be extended to provide treatment to the individual with antipsychotic medication pursuant to this section. An order pursuant to this section shall be valid until the first of the following events occurs:

(1) Ninety days from the date the individual is found incompetent to stand trial pursuant to Section 1370.01.

(2) Ninety days after the date when the individual is referred to a program described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370.01.

(3) Upon order of any court with jurisdiction over the individual, including pursuant to a program described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370.01.

(4) The individual is released from custody in the county jail.

(e) The court shall review the order no more than 60 days after an order is issued pursuant to this section to determine whether the grounds for the order remain. At the review, the psychiatrist shall file an affidavit with the court that ordered the involuntary medication affirming that the person who is the subject of the order continues to meet the criteria for involuntary medication. A copy of the affidavit shall be provided to the individual who is the subject of the order and the individual’s attorney. In determining whether the criteria for involuntary medication still exists, the court shall consider the affidavit of the psychiatrist or psychiatrists and any supplemental information provided by the individual’s attorney. The
 court may also require the testimony from the psychiatrist, if necessary. At the review, the court may make any appropriate order or keep the existing order in place subject to (d).

(f) An individual who is subject to an order made pursuant to this subdivision has the legal and civil rights set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 5325) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(g) This section does not preclude an individual from filing a petition for habeas corpus to challenge the continuing validity of an order authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medication.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before that date, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   (SB 820)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2604.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an adult housed in state prison is presumed to have the capacity to give informed consent and make a health care decision, to give or revoke an advance health care directive, and to designate or disqualify a surrogate. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(b) (1) Except as provided in Section 2602, a licensed physician or dentist may file a petition with the Office of Administrative Hearings to request that an administrative law judge make a determination as to a patient’s capacity to give informed consent or make a health care decision, and request appointment of a surrogate decisionmaker, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The licensed physician or dentist is treating a patient who is an adult housed in state prison.

(B) The licensed physician or dentist is unable to obtain informed consent from the inmate patient because the physician or dentist determines that the inmate patient appears to lack capacity to give informed consent or make a health care decision.

(C) There is no person with legal authority to provide informed consent for, or make decisions concerning the health care of, the inmate patient.

(2) Preference shall be given to the next of kin or a family member as a surrogate decisionmaker over other potential surrogate decisionmakers unless those individuals are unsuitable or unable to serve.

(c) The petition required by subdivision (b) shall allege all of the following:

(1) The inmate patient’s current physical condition, describing the health care conditions currently afflicting the inmate patient.

(2) The inmate patient’s current mental health condition resulting in the inmate patient’s inability to understand the nature and consequences of their need for care such that there is a lack of capacity to give informed consent or make a health care decision.

(3) The deficit or deficits in the inmate patient’s mental functions as listed in subdivision (a) of Section 811 of the Probate Code.

(4) An identification of a link, if any, between the deficits identified pursuant to paragraph (3) and an explanation of how the deficits
 identified pursuant to that paragraph result in the inmate patient’s inability to participate in a decision about their health care either knowingly and intelligently or by means of a rational thought process.

(5) A discussion of whether the deficits identified pursuant to paragraph (3) are transient, fixed, or likely to change during the proposed year-long duration of the court order.

(6) The efforts made to obtain informed consent or refusal from the inmate patient and the results of those efforts.

(7) The efforts made to locate next of kin who could act as a surrogate decisionmaker for the inmate patient. If those individuals are located, all of the following shall also be included, so far as the information is known:

(A) The names and addresses of
 the individuals.

(B) Whether any information exists to suggest that any of those individuals would not act in the inmate patient’s best interests.

(C) Whether any of those individuals are otherwise suitable to make health care decisions for the inmate patient.

(8) The probable impact on the inmate patient with, or without, the appointment of a surrogate decisionmaker.

(9) A discussion of the inmate patient’s desires, if known, and whether there is an advance health care directive or other documented indication of the inmate patient’s directives or desires and how those indications might influence the decision to issue an order. Additionally, any known advanced health care directives executed while the inmate patient had capacity shall be disclosed.

(10) The petitioner’s recommendation specifying a qualified and willing surrogate decisionmaker as described in subdivision (q), and the reasons for that recommendation.

(d) The petition shall be served on the inmate patient and the inmate patient’s counsel, and filed with the Office of Administrative Hearings on the same day as it was served. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall issue a notice appointing counsel.

(e) (1) At the time the initial petition is filed, the inmate patient shall be provided with counsel and a written notice advising the inmate patient of all of the following:

(A) The right to be present at the hearing.

(B) The right to be represented by
 counsel at all stages of the proceedings.

(C) The right to present evidence.

(D) The right to cross-examine witnesses.

(E) The right of either party to seek one reconsideration of the administrative law judge’s decision per calendar year.

(F) The right to file a petition for writ of administrative mandamus in superior court pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(G) The right to file a petition for writ of habeas corpus in superior court with respect to any decision.

(2) Counsel for the inmate patient shall have access to all relevant medical and central file records for the inmate patient, but shall not
 have access to materials unrelated to medical treatment located in the confidential section of the inmate patient’s central file. Counsel shall also have access to all health care appeals filed by the inmate patient and responses to those appeals, and, to the extent available, any habeas corpus petitions or health care related litigation filed by, or on behalf of, the inmate patient.

(f) The inmate patient shall be provided with a hearing before an administrative law judge within 30 days of the date of filing the petition, unless counsel for the inmate patient agrees to extend the date of the hearing.

(g) The inmate patient, or the inmate patient’s counsel, shall have 14 days from the date of filing of any petition to file a response to the petition, unless a shorter time for the hearing is sought by the licensed physician or dentist and ordered by the administrative law judge, in
 which case the judge shall set the time for filing a response. The response shall be served to all parties who were served with the initial petition and the attorney for the petitioner.

(h) In case of an emergency, as described in Section 3351 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations, the inmate patient’s physician or dentist may administer a medical intervention that requires informed consent prior to the date of the administrative hearing. Counsel for the inmate patient shall be notified by the physician or dentist.

(i) In either an initial or renewal proceeding, the inmate patient has the right to contest the finding of an administrative law judge authorizing a surrogate decisionmaker by filing a petition for writ of administrative mandamus pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(j) In
 either an initial or renewal proceeding, either party is entitled to file one motion for reconsideration per calendar year in front of the administrative law judge following a determination as to an inmate patient’s capacity to give informed consent or make a health care decision. The motion may seek to review the decision for the necessity of a surrogate decisionmaker, the individual appointed under the order, or both. The motion for reconsideration shall not require a formal rehearing unless ordered by the administrative law judge following submission of the motion, or upon the granting of a request for formal rehearing by any party to the action based on a showing of good cause.

(k) (1) To renew an existing order appointing a surrogate decisionmaker, the current physician or dentist, or a previously appointed surrogate decisionmaker shall file a renewal petition. The renewal shall be for an additional year at a time.
 The renewal hearing on any order issued under this section shall be conducted prior to the expiration of the current order, but not sooner than 10 days after the petition is filed, at which time the inmate patient shall be brought before an administrative law judge for a review of the inmate patient’s current medical and mental health condition.

(2) A renewal petition shall be served on the inmate patient and their counsel, and filed with the Office of Administrative Hearings on the same day as it was served. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall issue a written order appointing counsel.

(3) (A) The renewal hearing shall be held in accordance with subdivisions (d) to (g), inclusive.

(B) (i) At the time the renewal petition is filed, the inmate patient shall be
 provided with counsel and a written notice advising the inmate patient of all of the following:

(I) The right to be present at the hearing.

(II) The right to be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings.

(III) The right to present evidence.

(IV) The right to cross-examine witnesses.

(V) The right of either party to seek one reconsideration of the administrative law judge’s decision per calendar year.

(VI) The right to file a petition for writ of administrative mandamus in superior court pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(VII) The right to file a petition for writ of habeas corpus in superior court with respect to any decision.

(ii) Counsel for the inmate patient shall have access to all relevant medical and central file records for the inmate patient, but shall not have access to materials unrelated to medical treatment located in the confidential section of the inmate patient’s central file. Counsel shall also have access to all health care appeals filed by the inmate patient and responses to those appeals, and, to the extent available, any habeas corpus petitions or health care related litigation filed by, or on behalf of, the inmate patient.

(4) The renewal petition shall request the matter be reviewed by an administrative law judge, and allege all of the following:

(A) The current status of each of the elements set
 forth in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (c).

(B) Whether the inmate patient still requires a surrogate decisionmaker.

(C) Whether the inmate patient continues to lack capacity to give informed consent or make a health care decision.

(l) A licensed physician or dentist who submits a petition pursuant to this section shall not be required to obtain a court order pursuant to Section 3201 of the Probate Code prior to administering care that requires informed consent.

(m) This section does not affect the right of an inmate patient who has been determined to lack capacity to give informed consent or make a health care decision and for whom a surrogate decisionmaker has been appointed to do either of the following:

(1) Seek appropriate judicial relief to review the determination or appointment by filing a petition for writ of administrative mandamus pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) File a petition for writ of habeas corpus in superior court regarding the determination or appointment, or any treatment decision by the surrogate decisionmaker.

(n) A licensed physician or other health care provider whose actions under this section are in accordance with reasonable health care standards, a surrogate decisionmaker appointed pursuant to this section, and an administrative law judge shall not be liable for monetary damages or administrative sanctions for decisions made or actions taken consistent with this section and the known and documented desires of the inmate patient, or if unknown, the best interests of
 the inmate patient.

(o) The determinations required to be made pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (k), and the basis for those determinations, shall be documented in the inmate patient’s medical record.

(p) (1) With regard to any petition filed pursuant to subdivision (c) or (k), the administrative law judge shall determine and provide a written order and findings setting forth whether there has been clear and convincing evidence that all of the following occurred:

(A) Adequate notice and an opportunity to be heard has been given to the inmate patient and the inmate patient’s counsel.

(B) Reasonable efforts have been made to obtain informed consent from the inmate patient.

(C) As a result of one or more deficits in the inmate patient’s mental functions, the inmate patient lacks capacity to give informed consent or make a health care decision and is unlikely to regain that capacity over the next year.

(D) Reasonable efforts have been made to identify family members or relatives who could serve as a surrogate decisionmaker for the inmate patient.

(2) The written decision shall also specify and describe any advance health care directives or other documented indication of the inmate patient’s directives or desires regarding health care that were created and validly executed while the inmate patient had capacity.

(q) (1) If all findings required by subdivision (p) are made, the administrative law judge shall appoint a surrogate decisionmaker for health
 care for the inmate patient. In doing so, the administrative law judge shall consider all reasonable options presented, including those identified in the petition, and weigh how the proposed surrogate decisionmaker would represent the best interests of the inmate patient, the efficacy of achieving timely surrogate decisions, and the urgency of the situation. Family members or relatives of the inmate patient should be appointed when possible if such an individual is available and the administrative law judge determines the family member or relative will act in the inmate patient’s best interests.

(2) An employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or other peace officer, shall not be appointed surrogate decisionmaker for health care for any inmate patient under this section, unless either of the following conditions apply:

(A) The individual is a family member or
 relative of the inmate patient and will, as determined by the administrative law judge, act in the inmate patient’s best interests and consider the inmate patient’s personal values and other wishes to the extent those values and wishes are known.

(B) The individual is a health care staff member in a managerial position and does not provide direct care to the inmate patient. A surrogate decisionmaker appointed under this subparagraph may be specified by their functional role at the institution, such as “Chief Physician and Surgeon” or “Chief Medical Executive” to provide clarity as to the active decisionmaker at the institution where the inmate patient is housed, and to anticipate potential personnel changes. When the surrogate decisionmaker is specified by position, rather than by name, the person occupying that specified role at the institution at which the inmate patient is currently housed shall be considered and act as the appointed
 surrogate decisionmaker.

(3) The order appointing the surrogate decisionmaker shall be written and state the basis for the decision by reference to the particular mandates of this subdivision. The order shall also state that the surrogate decisionmaker shall honor and follow any advance health care directive or other documented indication of the inmate patient’s directives or desires, and specify any such directive, order, or documented desire.

(4) The surrogate decisionmaker shall follow the inmate patient’s personal values and other wishes to the extent those values and wishes are known.

(r) The administrative law judge’s written decision and order appointing a surrogate decisionmaker shall be placed in the inmate patient’s Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation health care record.

(s) An order entered under this section is valid for one year and the expiration date shall be written on the order. The order shall be valid at any state correctional facility within California. If the inmate patient is moved, the sending institution shall inform the receiving institution of the existence of an order entered under this section.

(t) (1) This section applies only to orders appointing a surrogate decisionmaker with authority to make a health care decision for an inmate patient who lacks capacity to give informed consent or make a health care decision.

(2) This section does not apply to existing law regarding health care to be provided in an emergency or existing law governing health care for unemancipated minors. This section shall not be used for the purposes of determining or
 directing an inmate patient’s control over finances, marital status, or for convulsive treatment, as described in Section 5325 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, psychosurgery, as defined in Section 5325 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, sterilization, abortion, or involuntary administration of psychiatric medication, as described in Section 2602.

(u) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may adopt regulations as necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 256, Sec. 12.   (SB 781)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2605.

(a) During the initial intake and classification process, and in a private setting, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall ask each individual entering into the custody of the department to specify all of the following:

(1) The individual’s gender identity of female, male, or nonbinary.

(2) Whether the individual identifies as transgender, nonbinary, or intersex.

(3) The individual’s gender pronoun and honorific.

(b) A person incarcerated by the department may not be disciplined for refusing to answer, or for not disclosing complete
 information in response to, the questions pursuant to this section.

(c) At any time, a person under the jurisdiction of the department may inform designated facility staff of their gender identity, and designated facility staff shall promptly repeat the process of offering the individual an opportunity to specify the gender pronoun and honorific most appropriate for staff to use in reference to that individual, in accordance with subdivision (a).

(d) Staff, contractors, and volunteers of the department shall not consistently fail to use the gender pronoun and honorific an individual has specified in all verbal and written communications with or regarding the individual that involve use of a pronoun and honorific.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Gender pronoun” means a third-person singular personal pronoun, such as “he,” “she,” or “they.”

(2) “Honorific” means a form of respectful address typically combined with an individual’s surname.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 182, Sec. 3.   (SB 132)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2606.

(a) An individual incarcerated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation who is transgender, nonbinary, or intersex, regardless of anatomy, shall:

(1) Be addressed in a manner consistent with the incarcerated individual’s gender identity.

(2) If lawfully searched, be searched according to the search policy for their gender identity or according to the gender designation of the facility where they are housed, based on the individual’s search preference. If the incarcerated individual’s preference or gender identity cannot be determined, the search shall be conducted according to the gender designation of the facility where they are housed.

(3) Be housed at a correctional facility designated for men or women based on the individual’s preference, including, if eligible, at a residential program for individuals under the jurisdiction of the department. These programs include, but are not limited to, the Alternative Custody Program, Custody to Community Transitional Reentry Program, Male Community Reentry Program, or Community Prisoner Mother Program.

(4) Have their perception of health and safety given serious consideration in any bed assignment, placement, or programming decision within the facility in which they are housed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) or subdivision (b), including, but not limited to, granting single-cell status, housing the individual with another incarcerated person of their choice, or removing the individual or individuals who pose a threat from any location where they may have access
 to the individual who has expressed a safety concern. If, pursuant to this paragraph, the individual is not granted an alternative based on their perception of health and safety, the department shall document the reasons for that denial and share them with the individual.

(b) If the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation has management or security concerns with an incarcerated individual’s search preference pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) or preferred housing placement pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or the secretary’s designee, shall, before denying a search preference or housing the incarcerated individual in a manner contrary to the person’s preferred housing placement, certify in writing a specific and articulable basis why the department is unable to accommodate that search or housing preference.

(c) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not deny a search preference pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) or a housing placement pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) based on any discriminatory reason, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) The anatomy, including, but not limited to, the genitalia or other physical characteristics, of the incarcerated person.

(2) The sexual orientation of the incarcerated person.

(3) For a denial of a housing preference pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), a factor present among other people incarcerated at the preferred type of facility.

(d) The incarcerated individual shall receive a copy of the
 written statement described in subdivision (b) and, within a reasonable time following the individual’s receipt of the statement, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide the individual with a meaningful opportunity to verbally raise any objections to that denial, and have those objections documented.

(e) If an incarcerated individual raises concerns for their health or safety at any time, their housing and placement shall be reassessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 182, Sec. 4.   (SB 132)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2607.

(a) An individual in custody of a state or local detention facility shall have the right to religious accommodation with respect to grooming, religious clothing, and headwear in observance of their sincerely held religious belief, at all times and throughout the facility, except if in furtherance of a compelling governmental interest with regard
 to institutional security that may impact the facility, staff, the individual, or others in custody. Religious grooming, clothing, and headwear accommodations shall only be denied when doing so would be the least restrictive means of furthering these governmental interests. This subdivision applies to each provision throughout this section.

(b) A facility shall
 do all of the following:

(1) (A) During the initial booking, intake, and classification process, facility staff shall ask each individual entering into their custody whether the individual practices a sincerely held religious belief that requires accommodation with respect to grooming, religious clothing, or religious headwear.

(B) The facility shall allow the individual in custody to purchase facility-issued, for local facilities, or department-approved, religious clothing and headwear or provide access, as defined in subdivision
 (c). If unavailable, the facility shall allow the individual to retain their religious clothing and headwear unless subdivision (a) applies, until facility-issued, for local facilities, or department-approved, religious clothing and headwear can be accessed or purchased. If purchased by an individual in custody, the price of facility-issued religious clothing and headwear shall not exceed the purchase price and normal taxes of the items.

(C) The
 facility shall not require an individual’s hair or beard be trimmed or cut during the booking, intake, or classification process and shall allow the individual in custody to maintain their hair and beard length according to their sincerely held religious beliefs.

(2) Unless exigent circumstances exist, when an individual in custody wearing religious clothing or headwear is searched, the facility shall do all of the following:

(A) Staff shall offer the individual in custody the opportunity to have this search conducted
 by members of the same gender and out of view of members of a differing gender.

(B) Following the search, staff shall
 return to the individual in custody, any religious clothing or headwear purchased, accessed, or retained pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), unless there is reason to confiscate the item due to a security risk, which shall be documented.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) For local facilities, “access” means making available religious clothing and headwear received through facility-approved vendors, outside donations, or items already issued or provided by the facilities.

(B) For state facilities, “access” means making available religious clothing and headwear received through department-approved vendors.

(2) “Individual in custody” means a person confined to a state or local detention facility, including, but not limited to, a person in the booking process; in temporary holding pending release, transfer, or appearance in court; during or awaiting trial proceedings; awaiting arraignment;
 sentenced to imprisonment; and imprisoned upon conviction.

(3) “Local detention facility” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 4027.

(4) “Religious grooming” should be construed broadly to include
 all forms of head, facial, and body hair that are part of an individual religious observance.

(5) “Religious clothing and headwear” includes a hijab, kufi, scarf, yarmulke, patka, turban, bandana, and modesty belief with regard to fully covering the arms and legs.

(d) This section applies without regard to whether the facility is operated pursuant to a contract with a private contractor and without regard to whether the individual in custody has been charged with or convicted of a crime.

(e) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section, including, but not limited to, establishing standards for department-approved items, expanding the items included in religious clothing and headwear, restricting locations, and establishing any additional limitations.

(f) An incarcerated person who believes their request for a religious accommodation as described in this section has been denied has the right to pursue relief pursuant to Chapter 21C (commencing with Section 2000cc) of Title 42 of the United States Code, known as the Religious Land Use and Institutionalized Persons Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   (SB 309)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Prisoners as Witnesses [2620. - 2626.]

2620.

(a) When it is necessary to have a person imprisoned in the state prison brought before any court to be tried for a felony, or for an examination before a grand jury or magistrate preliminary to trial for a felony, or for the purpose of hearing a motion or other proceeding, to vacate a judgment, an order for the prisoner’s temporary removal from prison, and for the prisoner’s production before the court, grand jury, or magistrate, must be made by the superior court of the county in which action, motion, or examination is pending or by a judge thereof. The order shall be made only upon the affidavit of the district attorney or defense attorney, stating the purpose for which that person is to be brought before the court, grand jury or magistrate or upon the court’s own motion. The order shall
 be executed by the sheriff of the county in which it shall be made, whose duty it shall be to bring the prisoner before the proper court, grand jury or magistrate, to safely keep the prisoner, and when the prisoner’s presence is no longer required to return the prisoner to the prison from whence the prisoner was taken. The expense of executing such order shall be a proper charge against, and shall be paid by, the county in which the order shall be made.

(b) An order pursuant to subdivision (a) shall recite the purposes for which that person is to be brought before the court, grand jury, or magistrate, and shall be signed by the judge making the order and sealed with the seal of the court. The order must be to the following effect:

County of ____ (as the case may be).

The people of the State of California to the warden of ____:

An order having been made this day by me, that A.B. be produced in the ____ court (or before the grand jury, as the case may be) to be prosecuted or examined for the crime of ____, a felony (or to have that motion heard), you are commanded to deliver the prisoner into the custody of ____ for the purpose of (recite purposes).

Dated this ____ day of ____, 20____.

(c) When a prisoner is removed from a state prison under this section the prisoner shall remain in the constructive custody of the warden thereof. During the prisoner’s absence from the prison, the prisoner may be ordered to appear in other felony proceedings as a defendant or witness in the superior court of the county from which the original order directing removal issued. A copy of the written order directing the prisoner to appear before that court shall be forwarded by the district attorney to
 the warden of the prison having protective custody of the prisoner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 495, Sec. 9.   (SB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2621.

When the testimony of a material witness is required in a criminal action, before any court in this state, or in an examination before a grand jury or magistrate in a felony case and such witness is a prisoner in a state prison, an order for the prisoner’s temporary removal from such prison, and for the prisoner’s production before such court, grand jury or magistrate, may be made by the superior court of the county in which such action or examination is pending or by a judge thereof; but in case the prison is out of the county in which the application is made, such order shall be made only upon the affidavit of the district attorney or of the defendant or the defendant’s counsel, showing that the testimony is material and necessary; and even then the granting of the order shall be in the discretion of said superior court or a judge thereof. The order shall be executed by the sheriff of the county in which it is made, whose duty it shall be to bring the prisoner before the proper court, grand jury or magistrate, to safely keep the prisoner, and when the prisoner is no longer required as a witness, to return the prisoner to the prison whence the prisoner was taken; the expense of executing such order shall be a proper charge against, and shall be paid by, the county in which the order shall be made. Such orders shall recite the purposes for which said person is to be brought before the court, grand jury or magistrate, and shall be signed by the magistrate or judge making the order, and sealed with the seal of the court, if any.

Such order must be to the following effect:

County of ____ (as the case may be).

The people of the State of California to the warden of ____:

An order having been made this day by me, that A.B. be produced in this court as witness in the case of ____, you are commanded to deliver the prisoner into the custody of ____ for the purpose of (recite purposes).

Dated this ____ day of ____, 19__.

When a prisoner is removed from a state prison under this section the prisoner shall remain in the constructive custody of the warden hereof. During the prisoner’s absence from the prison, the prisoner may be ordered to appear in other felony proceedings as a defendant or witness in the courts of the county from which the original order directing removal issued. A copy of the written order directing the prisoner to appear before any such court shall be forwarded by the district attorney to the warden of the prison having protective custody of the prisoner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 430.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2621.5.

The provisions of Sections 2620 and 2621 which impose a charge upon the counties shall not apply to cases coming within the provisions of Section 4750.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1310, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2622.

When the order for personal appearance is not made pursuant to Section 2620 or Section 2621 the deposition of the prisoner may be taken in the manner provided for in the case of a witness who is sick, and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1335) of Title 10 of Part 2 shall, so far as applicable, govern in the application for and in the taking and use of that deposition. The deposition may be taken before any magistrate or notary public of the county in which the prison is situated; or in case the defendant is unable to pay for taking the deposition, before an officer of the prison designated by the board, whose duty it shall be to act without compensation. Every officer before whom testimony shall be taken under this section, shall have authority to administer, and shall administer, an oath to the witness that his or her testimony shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 119.)
-------------------------------------------

2623.
